Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2842
Public health clinic, defined.

Public health clinic means the department, any county, city-county, or multicounty health department, or any private not-for-profit family planning clinic licensed as a health clinic as defined in section 71-416.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 938.